District of Columbia statutes.
16-1117

New trial as to assessment.

Either party who feels aggrieved by the assessment provided for by section 16-1116 , may, within four days after the verdict, move to set the assessment aside, and the court may, for good cause shown, set the verdict aside and order another jury to be empaneled in the cause to make a new assessment.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 567, Pub. L. 88-567, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 16-1117.
1973 Ed., § 16-1117.

Prior Codifications